Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 7. Miscellaneous Regulatory Provisions.

§79-10-101.
Annual report to Secretary of State.

The annual report required by Section 79-4-16.22, Mississippi Code of 1972, for each domestic professional corporation, and for each foreign professional corporation authorized to transact business in this state, must include a statement that all of its shareholders are qualified persons with respect to the corporation or in the case of a foreign professional corporation that all of its shareholders meet the requirements of Section 79-10-91(2)(c).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 205, 275, 284.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1612.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 968 et seq.

§79-10-103.
Rulemaking by licensing authority.

Each licensing authority is empowered to promulgate rules expressly authorized by this chapter if the rules are consistent with the public interest or required by the public health or welfare or by generally recognized standards of professional conduct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

Rules promulgated in accordance with this section are included within the definition of “law” as used in this chapter, see § 79-10-5.

§79-10-105.
Licensing authority’s regulatory jurisdiction.

This chapter does not restrict the jurisdiction of a licensing authority over individuals rendering a professional service within the jurisdiction of the licensing authority, nor does it affect the interpretation or application of any law pertaining to standards of professional conduct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 494, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1995.